Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2824.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1289.7a, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1289.7a. A. No person, property owner, tenant,
employer, or business entity shall maintain, establish, or enforce
any policy or rule that has the effect of prohibiting any person,
except a convicted felon, from transporting and storing firearms or
Req. No. 10800 Page 1

ammu nition in a locked motor vehicle, or from transporting and
storing firearms or ammunition locked in or locked to a motor
vehicle on any property set aside for any motor vehicle.
B. No person, property owner, tenant, employer, or business
entity shall be liable in any civil action for occurrences which
result from the storing of establish or enforce any policy or rule
that prohibits any person or employee, except a convicted felon,
from transporting, carrying, or storing firearms or ammunition in a
locked motor vehicle on any property set aside for any motor
vehicle, unless the person, property owner, tenant, employer, or
owner of the business entity commits a criminal act involving the
use of the firearms or ammunition. The provisions of this
subsection shall not apply to claims pursuant to the Workers'
Compensation Act or a motor vehicle owned, leased, or rented by the
person or employee to conduct business for the business entity.
C. An individual may bring a civil action to enforce this
section. If a plaintiff prevails in a civil action related to the
personnel manual against a person, property owner, tenant, employer
or business for a violation of this section, the court shall award
actual damages, enjoin further violations of this section, and award
court costs and attorney fees to the prevailing plaintiff.
D. As used in this section, "motor vehicle" means any
automobile, truck, minivan, sports utility vehicle, motorcycle,

Req. No. 10800 Page 2

moto r scooter, and any other vehicle required to be registered under
the Oklahoma Vehicle License and Registration Act.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1290.22, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1290.22.
BUSINESS PRIVATE PROPERTY OWNER'S RIGHTS
A. Except as provided in subsections B, C and D of this
section, nothing contained in any provision of the Oklahoma Self-
Defense Act shall be construed to limit, restrict or prohibit in any
manner the existing rights of any person, property owner, tenant,
employer, liquor store, place of worship or business entity to
control the possession of weapons on any property owned or
controlled by the person or business entity.
B. 1. No person, property owner, tenant, employer, liquor
store, holder of an event permit, place of worship or business
entity shall be permitted to establish any policy or rule that has
the effect of prohibiting prohibits any person, except a convicted
felon, from transporting and storing firearms in a locked motor
vehicle on any property set aside for any motor vehicle or from
transporting, carrying, or storing firearms or ammunition in a motor
vehicle owned, leased, or rented by the person or employee while
conducting business for the business entity.
2. An individual may bring a civil action to enforce the
provisions of paragraph 1 of this subsection. If a plaintiff
Req. No. 10800 Page 3

prev ails in a civil action against a person, property owner, tenant,
employer, liquor store, place of worship or business, for a policy
or rule that violates paragraph 1 of this subsection, the court
shall award actual damages, enjoin further violations of paragraph 1
of this subsection, and award court costs and attorney fees to the
prevailing plaintiff. The provisions of this subsection shall not
apply to claims pursuant to the Administrative Workers' Compensation
Act.
C. A property owner, tenant, employer, liquor store, place of
worship or business entity may prohibit any person from carrying a
concealed or unconcealed firearm on the property. If the building
or property is open to the public, the property owner, tenant,
employer, liquor store, place of worship or business entity shall
post signs on or about the property stating such prohibition.
D. No person, property owner, tenant, employer, liquor store,
holder of an event permit, place of worship or business entity shall
be permitted to establish any policy or rule that has the effect of
prohibiting any person from carrying a concealed or unconcealed
firearm on property within the specific exclusion provided for in
paragraph 4 of subsection B of Section 1277 of this title; provided
that carrying a concealed or unconcealed firearm may be prohibited
in the following places:
1. The portion of a public property structure or building
during an event authorized by the city, town, county, state or
Req. No. 10800 Page 4

fede ral governmental authority owning or controlling such building
or structure;
2. Any public property sports field including any adjacent
seating or adjacent area set aside for viewing a sporting event,
where an elementary or secondary school, collegiate, or professional
sporting event or an International Olympic Committee or organization
or any committee subordinate to the International Olympic Committee
event is being held;
3. The fairgrounds during the Oklahoma State Fair or the Tulsa
State Fair; and
4. The portion of a public property structure or building that
is leased or under contract to a business or not-for-profit entity
or group for offices.
E. The otherwise lawful carrying of a concealed or unconcealed
firearm by a person on property that has signs prohibiting the
carrying of firearms shall subject the person to being denied
entrance onto the property or removed from the property. If the
person:
1. Has been informed by the property owner, business entity or
manager of the business that the person is in violation of a policy
that prohibits firearms on the property; and
2. Refuses to leave the property and a peace officer is
summoned, the person shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a

Req. No. 10800 Page 5

misd emeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed Two Hundred Fifty
Dollars ($250.00).
F. A person, property owner, tenant, employer, liquor store,
holder of an event permit, place of worship or business entity that
does or does not prohibit any individual, except a convicted felon,
from carrying a loaded or unloaded, concealed or unconcealed weapon
on property that the person, property owner, tenant, employer,
liquor store, holder of an event permit, place of worship or
business entity owns, or has legal control of, is immune from shall
not be subject to any liability arising from that decision. Except
for acts of gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct, an
employer who does or does not prohibit his or her employees from
carrying a concealed or unconcealed weapon is immune from shall not
be subject to any liability arising from that decision. A person,
property owner, tenant, employer, liquor store, holder of an event
permit, place of worship or business entity that does not prohibit
persons from carrying a concealed or unconcealed weapon pursuant to
subsection D of this section shall not be immune from subject to any
liability arising from the carrying of a concealed or unconcealed
weapon, while in the scope of employment, on the property or in or
about a business entity motor vehicle. Any employee, using his or
her own private motor vehicle or a motor vehicle that is personally
rented or leased by the employee, may transport a firearm or other
legal weapon in the motor vehicle while conducting business for the
Req. No. 10800 Page 6

busi ness entity and shall not be prohibited from transporting such
firearm or weapon by any policy or rule of the business entity. The
provisions of this subsection shall not apply to claims pursuant to
the Administrative Workers' Compensation Act.
G. It shall not be considered part of an employee's job
description or within the employee's scope of employment if an
employee is allowed to carry or discharge a weapon pursuant to this
section.
H. Nothing in subsections F and G of this section shall prevent
an employer, employee or person who has suffered loss resulting from
the discharge of a weapon to seek redress or damages of the person
who discharged the weapon or used the weapon outside the provisions
of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act.
I. As used in this section, "motor vehicle" means any
automobile, truck, minivan, sports utility vehicle, motorcycle,
motor scooter, and any other vehicle required to register under the
Oklahoma Vehicle License and Registration Act.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10800 GRS 01/04/25




Req. No. 10800 Page 7